Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 6. Online Political Advertisements.

§ 24.2-960.
Identification and certification by online political advertisers.

Prior to purchasing an online political advertisement from or promoting an online political advertisement on an online platform, a person shall identify himself to the online platform as an online political advertiser and certify to the online platform that he is permitted under state and local laws to lawfully purchase or promote for a fee online political advertisements.

An online platform shall establish reasonable procedures to enable online political advertisers to comply with the identification and certification requirements of subsection A.

An online platform may rely in good faith on the information provided by online political advertisers under this section when selling online political advertisements to online political advertisers.

History.

2020, c. 551.